Virginia statutes. Title 56. Public Service Companies.
Chapter 23. Virginia Electric Utility Regulation Act.
§ 56-585.3.
Regulation of cooperative rates after rate caps.

After the expiration or termination of capped rates, the rates, terms and conditions of distribution electric cooperatives subject to Article 1 (§ 56-231.15 et seq.) of Chapter 9.1 shall be regulated in accordance with the provisions of Chapters 9.1 (§
56-231.15 et seq.) and 10 (§ 56-232 et seq.), as modified by the following provisions:

Except for energy related cost (fuel cost), the Commission shall not require any cooperative to adjust, modify, or revise its rates, by means of riders or otherwise, to reflect changes in wholesale power cost which occurred during the capped rate period,
other than in a general rate proceeding;

Each cooperative may, without Commission approval or the requirement of any filing other than as provided in this subdivision, upon an affirmative resolution of its board of directors, increase or decrease all classes of its rates for distribution services
at any time, provided, however, that such adjustments will not effect a cumulative net increase or decrease in excess of five percent in such rates in any three-year period. Such adjustments will not affect or be limited
by any existing fuel or wholesale power cost adjustment provisions. The cooperative will promptly file any such revised rates with the Commission for informational purposes;

Each cooperative may, without Commission approval, upon an affirmative resolution of its board of directors, make any adjustment to its terms and conditions that does not affect the cooperative’s revenues from the distribution or supply of electric energy.
In addition, a cooperative may make such adjustments to any pass-through of third-party service charges and fees, and to any fees, charges and deposits set out in Schedule F of such cooperative’s Terms and Conditions filed
as of January 1, 2007. The cooperative will promptly file any such amended terms and conditions with the Commission for informational purposes;

Each cooperative may, without Commission approval or the requirement of any filing other than as provided in this subdivision, upon an affirmative resolution of its board of directors, make any adjustment to its rates reasonably calculated to collect
any or all of the fixed costs of owning and operating its electric distribution system, including without limitation, such costs as are identified as customer-related costs in a cost of service study, through a new or modified
fixed monthly charge, rather than through volumetric charges associated with the use of electric energy or demand, or to rebalance among any of the fixed monthly charge, distribution demand, and distribution energy; however,
such adjustments shall be revenue neutral based on the cooperative’s determination of the proper intra-class allocation of the revenues produced by its then current rates. If a rate class contains a supply demand charge,
the cooperative may rebalance its rate for electricity supply service pursuant to this subdivision. The cooperative may elect, but is not required, to implement such adjustments through incremental changes over the course
of up to three years. The cooperative shall file promptly revised tariffs reflecting any such adjustments with the Commission for informational purposes;

A cooperative may, at any time after the expiration or termination of capped rates, petition the Commission for approval of one or more rate adjustment clauses for the timely and current recovery from customers of the costs described in subdivisions A
5 b and e of § 56-585.1;

A cooperative that is not a current member of a utility aggregation cooperative may at any time petition the Commission for approval of one or more rate adjustment clauses for the timely and current recovery of cost from customers of (i) one or more generation
facilities, (ii) one or more major unit modifications of generation facilities, or (iii) one or more pumped hydroelectricity generation and storage facilities. A cooperative seeking a rate adjustment clause pursuant to
this subdivision shall have the right, after notice and the opportunity for a hearing, to recover the costs of a facility described in clauses (i), (ii), or (iii) in a rate adjustment clause including construction work
in progress and allowance for funds during construction, planning, and development costs of infrastructure associated therewith. The costs of the facility other than projected construction work in progress and allowance
for funds used during construction shall not be recovered prior to the date that the facility either (a) begins commercial operation or (b) comes under the ownership of the cooperative. For the purposes of this subdivision,
the cooperative’s cost of capital shall be recoverable in such a rate adjustment clause and shall be set as either the cooperative’s long-term cost of debt or most recent rate of return authorized by the Commission in a
rate proceeding. In any proceeding conducted pursuant to this subdivision, the Commission shall consider that all costs expended and revenues recovered arising out of the procurement of generation resources pursuant to
this subdivision will inure to the benefit of the general membership of the cooperative. Nothing in this subdivision shall relieve a cooperative from any requirement to obtain a certificate of public convenience and necessity
for purposes of constructing generation in the Commonwealth. The Commission’s final order regarding any petition filed pursuant to this subdivision shall be entered not more than nine months after the date of filing of
such petition. If such petition is approved, the order shall direct that the applicable rate adjustment clause be applied to customers’ bills not more than 60 days after the date of the order. Any petition filed pursuant
to this subdivision shall be considered by the Commission on a stand-alone basis without regard to the other costs, revenues, investments, or earnings of the cooperative. Any costs incurred by a cooperative prior to the
filing of such petition, or during the consideration thereof by the Commission, that are proposed for recovery in such petition, shall be deferred on the books and records of the cooperative until the Commission’s final
order in the matter, or until the implementation of any applicable approved rate adjustment clause, whichever is later;

A cooperative may adopt any other cooperative’s voluntary rate, voluntary program (including a pilot program), or voluntary tariff, and cost recovery therefor, by submitting the same to the Commission for administrative approval. The staff of the Commission
shall have the authority to approve such administrative filing notwithstanding any other provision of law; and

A cooperative may, without approval of the Commission or the requirement of any filing other than as provided in this subsection, upon an affirmative resolution of its board of directors, approve any voluntary tariff, and cost recovery therefor, and shall
promptly file any such tariff with the Commission for informational purposes.

None of the adjustments described in subdivisions A 2 through A 5 will apply to the rates paid by any customer that takes service by means of dedicated distribution facilities and had noncoincident peak demand in excess of 90 megawatts in calendar year
2006.

Nothing in this section shall be deemed to grant to a cooperative any authority to amend or adjust any terms and conditions of service or agreements regarding pole attachments or the use of the cooperative’s poles or conduits.

History.
2007, cc. 888, 933; 2009, cc. 401, 824; 2019, cc. 625, 742, 763; 2022, cc. 363, 364.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, cc. 742 and 763, cl. 3 provides: “That on or before March 1, 2020, a Phase II Utility, as such term is defined in subdivision A 1 of § 56-585.1 of the Code of Virginia, shall develop and submit to the State Corporation Commission for approval
retail rate schedules designed to offer time-varying pricing, including at least one non-demand rate schedule. Customer-generators or agricultural customer-generators participating in net metering may elect to be served under such
time-varying rate schedule at such time as the customer-generator or agricultural customer-generator is served by advanced-metering technology equipment satisfactory to the utility.”

Acts 2019, cc. 742 and 763, cl. 4 provides: “That on or before March 1, 2020, a Phase II Utility, as such term is defined in subdivision A 1 of § 56-585.1 of the Code of Virginia, shall develop and submit to the State Corporation Commission for approval
an incentive program for the installation of equipment to develop electric energy derived from sunlight for customers served under time-varying retail rate schedules that have advanced-metering technology equipment satisfactory to
the utility.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 401 inserted the A designation at the beginning of the first paragraph; added subdivision A 4; redesignated former subdivisions 4 and 5 as subdivision A 5 and subsection B; substituted “A 2 through A 5” for “2 through 4” in subsection
B; and inserted the C designation at the beginning of the last paragraph.

The 2009 amendment by c. 824 substituted “A 5 b and e” for “A 5 b and d” in subdivision 4.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 625 added subdivisions A 6 and 7; and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 742 and 763 are identical, and in subdivision A 4, inserted “or demand, or to rebalance among any of the fixed monthly charge, distribution demand, and distribution energy” and “If a rate class contains a supply demand charge,
the cooperative may rebalance its rate for electricity supply service pursuant to this subdivision” and made stylistic changes.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 363 and 364 are identical, and added subdivision A 8 and made stylistic changes.

§ 56-585.4.
Net energy metering transition provisions for electric cooperatives.

Distribution electric cooperatives subject to Article 1 (§ 56-231.15 et seq.) of Chapter 9.1 shall be regulated in accordance with the provisions of Chapters 9.1 (§ 56-231.15 et seq.) and 10 (§ 56-232 et seq.), as amended by relevant sections of this
chapter and by the following provisions:

Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this title, each cooperative may, without Commission approval or the requirement of any filing other than as provided in this subdivision, upon the adoption by its board of directors of a resolution so providing,
make adjustments in the cooperative’s rates, terms, conditions, and rate schedules governing net energy metering as provided in this section by electing to subject itself to the provisions of this section. The cooperative promptly
shall (i) file such resolution and notice with the Commission for informational purposes and (ii) place a notice of its board of directors’ adoption of such resolution (the Cooperative Net Energy Metering Transition Notice) on
the cooperative’s website. The Cooperative Net Energy Metering Transition Notice shall contain an initial election date and a date upon which, for each class of net energy metering customer, the transition shall become effective
upon the first to occur of (a) the date the cooperative reaches the cap set forth in subsection F of § 56-594.01 or (b) five years following the date of the initial Cooperative Net Energy Metering Transition Notice. If a cooperative
transitions a given class of customers as a result of reaching a cap set forth in subsection F of § 56-594.01, the effectiveness of such transition shall be permanent, regardless of future changes in the cooperative’s system peak.
A Cooperative Net Energy Metering Transition Notice may be amended and refiled as the cooperative deems appropriate at any time. Any eligible customer-generator as defined in § 56-594 that was interconnected prior to a transition
start date enumerated in a Cooperative Net Energy Metering Transition Notice may continue to participate in net energy metering pursuant to the terms of § 56-594.01 until July 1, 2039.

After the transition date for a class of customers, any standby charges implemented by the cooperative pursuant to subsection H of § 56-594.01 shall be eliminated and are prohibited. The cooperative may make any necessary changes to rate schedules or
terms and conditions and shall promptly file the same with the Commission for informational purposes.

Whenever the cooperative’s transition date occurs, the cooperative may establish and publish, without Commission approval or the requirement of any filing other than as provided in this subdivision, a new rate schedule or rider for purposes of its new
net energy metering program established pursuant to this section and shall promptly file the same with the Commission for informational purposes.

The new rate schedule or rider described in subdivision 3 may contain a demand charge or charges for distribution, supply, or both, based upon a customer’s monthly, ratcheted, or 60-minute absolute value noncoincident peak demand for customers that were
not previously subject to demand charges in each rate class; however, such demand charges shall be revenue neutral based on the cooperative’s determination of the proper intra-class allocation of the revenues produced by its then-current
rates serving the same rate class of customer. The cooperative shall implement such new demand charge through the provisions of subdivision 5. The cooperative shall file promptly revised tariffs reflecting any such new demand charges
with the Commission for informational purposes. The demand charge component of any net energy metering rate class derived from a rate class with a preexisting demand charge shall remain fixed for a period of five years. The fixed
monthly customer charge of any net energy metering rate class derived from a preexisting rate class having a fixed monthly customer charge less than or equal to $20 as of the transition date shall not exceed $20 for the duration
of the five-year period described in subdivision 5. During the five-year period described in subdivision 5, a cooperative may not increase the monthly customer charge of any net energy metering rate class derived from a preexisting
rate class having a fixed monthly customer charge greater than $20 as of the transition date. Demand charges included in a new rate schedule or rider shall apply to net energy metering customers, regardless of whether a customer
uses a third-party partial requirements power purchase agreement or not.

For purposes of implementing subdivision 4, a cooperative shall, after the published transition date for a given class of customers, close its existing net energy metering rate schedule rider to new customers and open a new tariff pursuant to subdivision
3. Demand charges shall be implemented over a five-year period. In the first year of the five-year period, the demand charges shall be set to zero. In the second year of the five-year period, implementation of the demand rates
may begin, and demand charges shall not exceed $0.25 per kilowatt of distribution demand and $0.25 per kilowatt of supply demand. In the third year of the five-year period, the demand charges shall not exceed $0.50 per kilowatt
of distribution demand and $0.50 per kilowatt of supply demand. In the fourth year of the five-year period, the demand charges shall not exceed $0.75 per kilowatt of distribution demand and $0.75 per kilowatt of supply demand.
In the fifth year of the five-year period, the demand charges shall not exceed $1 per kilowatt of distribution demand and $1 per kilowatt of supply demand. Following the expiration of the five-year period, the cooperative is authorized
to rebalance its rates. In any filing for informational purposes, the cooperative shall clearly set forth to the Commission the schedule for the five-year period.

After the transition date for a given class of customers, the following caps, which shall be in lieu of the caps established by subsection F of § 56-594.01, shall apply to net energy metering for that class of customer. The caps shall be calculated as
described in subsection F of § 56-594.01 except that the caps shall be adjusted as follows, expressed in alternating current nameplate capacity of the generators: three percent of system peak for residential customers, four percent
of system peak for not-for-profit and nonjurisdictional customers, and two percent for other nonresidential customers.

After the transition date for a given class of customers, only the following restrictions shall apply to the capacity of a net energy metering electrical generating facility:

For nonresidential customers, the maximum capacity shall not exceed the least of:

1.2 megawatts alternating current;

One percent of the cooperative’s system peak calculated according to the methodology described in subsection F of § 56-594.01; or

The expected annual energy consumption based on the previous 12 months of billing history or an annualized calculation of billing history if 12 months of billing history is not available; and

For residential customers, the maximum capacity shall not exceed 125 percent of the expected annual energy consumption based on the previous 12 months of billing history or an annualized calculation of billing history if 12 months of billing history is
not available.

After the transition date for a given class of customers, third-party partial requirements power purchase agreements entered into with registered providers shall be permitted for that class of customer pursuant to subsection K of § 56-594.01.

History.
2019, cc. 742, 763.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, cc. 742 and 763, cl. 2 provides: “That no later than 60 days after the effective date of this act each Phase II Utility, as such term is defined in subdivision A 1 of § 56-585.1 of the Code of Virginia, shall convene a stakeholder process to
make recommendations to the utility concerning (i) the development of retail rate schedules designed to offer time-varying pricing that take advantage of advanced metering technology and related investments in customer information
systems; (ii) the development of incentive programs for the installation of equipment to develop electric energy derived from sunlight for customers using advanced metering technology served under such time-varying rate schedules;
(iii) the possible transition of net metering customers using advanced metering technology to the time-varying rate schedules; (iv) peak shaving programs; (v) the provision of on-site distributed renewable generation to multifamily
dwellings; and (vi) related system effects and requirements arising from distributed generation resources. An independent facilitator with expertise in rate design, cost recovery, and solar markets, compensated by the utility, offset
by such contributions from members of the stakeholder group as the members deem appropriate, shall facilitate such stakeholder process. The utility shall consult with the stakeholder group and the State Corporation Commission prior
to engaging the independent facilitator. Such stakeholder process shall include representatives from the utility, the State Corporation Commission, the office of Consumer Counsel of the Attorney General, the Department of Mines, Minerals
and Energy, net-metering program administrators, customer-generators, agricultural customer-generators, solar energy program implementers, solar energy providers, energy efficiency advocates, other residential and small business customers,
and any other interested stakeholder who the utility deems appropriate for inclusion in such process. The utility shall report on the status of the work of the stakeholder group and the programs developed in conjunction with such stakeholder
group, including the petitions filed and the determination thereon, to the Governor, the State Corporation Commission, and the Chairmen of the House and Senate Committees on Commerce and Labor on January 1, 2020, and thereafter on
January 1 of each successive year. The scope of the work of the stakeholder group convened pursuant to this enactment shall include the following:

“1. In developing the retail rate schedules designed to offer time-varying pricing that take advantage of advanced metering technology, the stakeholder group shall include at least one non-demand schedule.

“2. In developing incentive programs for the installation of equipment to develop electric energy derived from sunlight for customers using advanced metering technology served under such time-varying rate schedules, the stakeholder group shall seek to
accelerate solar development without adversely impacting other non-solar customers and to establish appropriate incentives to sustain the program, including consideration of the expiration of federal tax incentives available. Any such
incentive program shall be limited to net-metering customers until other customers receive advanced metering technology.

“3. In developing recommendations for the possible transition of net metering customers to the time-varying rate schedules, the stakeholder group shall (i) recommend the timing and increases in the net-metering cap to take advantage of the deployment
of advanced metering technology and the approval of time-varying rate schedules, in a range estimated to be between two percent and four percent, and (ii) recommend appropriate increases in customer class caps, aligned with potential
system cap increases, and the timing of deployment of advanced metering technology, taking into consideration infrastructure costs and rate impacts of higher solar distributed generation capacity. The stakeholder group shall recommend
capacity and market milestones for growth of solar distributed generation capacity.

“4. The stakeholder group shall develop recommendations related to distributed generation resources, including rate design options for the possible transition from retail net metering to successor time-varying rate schedules, recognizing the dependency
of such rate design to the deployment of advanced metering technology. The stakeholder group design shall encourage rate stability and allow sufficient transition time for customer education. The stakeholder group shall seek to encourage
voluntary transition to time-varying rate schedules and shall provide mechanisms to gather data from such early adopters in order to minimize program impacts on existing net metering customers and other ratepayers. The stakeholder
group shall make recommendations about the appropriate grandfathering of existing net metering customers who elect not to be served under the time-varying rate schedules.

“5. The stakeholder group may address the availability of power purchase agreements, standby and demand charges, Schedule 19 PURPA contracts, distributed generation storage deployment, and other topics that the facilitator deems appropriate.”

Acts 2019, cc. 742 and 763, cl. 3 provides: “That on or before March 1, 2020, a Phase II Utility, as such term is defined in subdivision A 1 of § 56-585.1 of the Code of Virginia, shall develop and submit to the State Corporation Commission for approval
retail rate schedules designed to offer time-varying pricing, including at least one non-demand rate schedule. Customer-generators or agricultural customer-generators participating in net metering may elect to be served under such
time-varying rate schedule at such time as the customer-generator or agricultural customer-generator is served by advanced-metering technology equipment satisfactory to the utility.”

Acts 2019, cc. 742 and 763, cl. 4 provides: “That on or before March 1, 2020, a Phase II Utility, as such term is defined in subdivision A 1 of § 56-585.1 of the Code of Virginia, shall develop and submit to the State Corporation Commission for approval
an incentive program for the installation of equipment to develop electric energy derived from sunlight for customers served under time-varying retail rate schedules that have advanced-metering technology equipment satisfactory to
the utility.”